test/src/gt-norm-yamls/proper-smj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Lulesami names in Lexicons ACCRA, MARJA, LONDON, BASUDIS, VARGGAT, ALEUHTAT, ANAR, DUORTNUS, TIEMPEL, EATNAMAT, DAVVISUOLU, GEAVNNIS, SULLOT

Tests:

  Propernoun - Gejrá: # ACCRA-mal
    Gejrá+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom: Gejrá
    Gejrá+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen: Gejrá
    Gejrá+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc: Gejráv
    Gejrá+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ine: Gejrán
    Gejrá+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill: Gejráj
    Gejrá+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela: Gejrás
    Gejrá+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Com: Gejrájn
    Gejrá+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Nom: Gejrá
    Gejrá+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Ill: Gejrájda
    Gejrá+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Ess: Gejrán
    Gejrá+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Gejrá+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
#  Propernoun - Pentá: # ACCRA-obj
#    Pentá+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom: Pentá
#    Pentá+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen: Pentá
#    Pentá+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Acc: Pentáv
#    Pentá+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ine: Pentán
#    Pentá+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill: Pentáj
#    Pentá+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela: Pentás
#    Pentá+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Com: Pentájn
#    Pentá+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Pl+Nom: Pentá
#    Pentá+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Pl+Ill: Pentájda
#    Pentá+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Ess: Pentán
#    Pentá+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
#    Pentá+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
 
  Propernoun - Gáhti: # ACCRA-fem
    Gáhti+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom: Gáhti
    Gáhti+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen: Gádi
    Gáhti+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Acc: Gádiv
    Gáhti+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ine: Gádin
    Gáhti+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill: Gáhtij
    Gáhti+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela: Gádis
    Gáhti+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Com: Gádijn
    Gáhti+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Nom: Gádi
    Gáhti+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Ill: Gádijda
    Gáhti+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Ess: Gáhtin
    Gáhti+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Gáhti+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Propernoun - Británna: # ACCRA-plc
    Británna+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Británna
    Británna+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Británna
    Británna+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Británnav
    Británna+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: Británnan
    Británna+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Británnaj 
    Británna+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: Británnas
    Británna+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: Británnajn
    Británna+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Británna
    Británna+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Británnajda
    Británna+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Británnan
    Británna+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: británnalasj
    Británna+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: británnak
    
  Propernoun - Ráhka: # ACCRA-sur
    Ráhka+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom: Ráhka
    Ráhka+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen: Ráhka
    Ráhka+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Acc: Ráhkav
    Ráhka+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ine: Ráhkan
    Ráhka+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill: Ráhkaj
    Ráhka+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela: Ráhkas
    Ráhka+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Com: Ráhkajn
    Ráhka+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Nom: Ráhka
    Ráhka+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Ill: Ráhkajda
    Ráhka+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Ess: Ráhkan
    Ráhka+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Der/lasj+Sg+Nom: []
    Ráhka+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Propernoun - Gáddjá: # MARJA-fem
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom: Gáddjá
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen: Gádjá
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Acc: Gádjáv
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ine: Gádján
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill: Gáddjáj
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela: Gádjás
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Com: Gádjájn
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Nom: Gádjá
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Ill: Gádjájda
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Ess: Gáddján
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der/gusj+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Gádjágusj
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der/gusj+N+Prop+Sg+Acc: Gádjáguttjav

  Propernoun - Mummistállo: # MARJA-ani
    Mummistállo+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Nom: [Mummistállo, Muminstállo]
    Mummistállo+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Gen: [Mummistálo, Muminstálo]
    Mummistállo+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Acc: [Mummistálov, Muminstálov]
    Mummistállo+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ine: [Mummistálon, Muminstálon]
    Mummistállo+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ill: [Mummistálluj, Muminstálluj]
    Mummistállo+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ela: [Mummistálos, Muminstálos]
    Mummistállo+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Com: [[Mummistálujn, Mummistálojn, Muminstálojn, Muminstálujn]
    Mummistállo+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Pl+Nom: [Mummistálo, Muminstálo]
    Mummistállo+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Pl+Ill: [Mummistálojda, Muminstálojda]
    Mummistállo+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Ess: Mummistállon, Muminstállon]
    Mummistállo+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Mummistállo+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Máhttu: # MARJA-mal
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom: Máhttu
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen: Máhtu
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc: Máhtuv
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ine: Máhtun
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill: Máhttuj
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela: Máhtus
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Com: Máhtujn
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Nom: Máhtu
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Ill: Máhtujda
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Ess: Máhttun
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Snøhvitprosjækta: # MARJA-obj
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom: [Snøhvitprosjækta, Snøhvitprosjäkta]
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen: Snøhvitprosjevta
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Acc: Snøhvitprosjevtav
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ine: Snøhvitprosjevtan
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill: [Snøhvitprosjæktaj, Snøhvitprosjäktaj]
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela: Snøhvitprosjevtas
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Com: Snøhvitprosjevtajn
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Pl+Nom: Snøhvitprosjevta
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Pl+Ill: Snøhvitprosjevtajda
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Ess: [Snøhvitprosjæktan, Snøhvitprosjäktan]
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Stuorradigge: # MARJA-org
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom: Stuorradigge
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen: Stuorradikke
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Acc: Stuorradikkev
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ine: Stuorradikken
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill: Stuorradiggáj
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela: Stuorradikkes
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Com: Stuorradikkijn
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Nom: Stuorradikke
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Ill: Stuorradikkijda
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Ess: Stuorradiggen
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
  
  Propernoun - Euråvpåráde: # MARJA-org
    Euråvpåráde+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom: [Europaráde, Euråvpåráde      ]
    Euråvpåráde+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen: [Europaráde, Euråvpåráde      ]
    Euråvpåráde+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Acc: [Europarádev, Euråvpårádev    ]
    Euråvpåráde+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ine: [Europaráden, Euråvpåráden    ]
    Euråvpåráde+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill: [Europarádáj, Euråvpårádáj    ]
    Euråvpåráde+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela: [Europarádes,Euråvpårádes     ]
    Euråvpåráde+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Com: [Europarádijn, Euråvpårádijn  ]
    Euråvpåráde+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Nom: [Europaráde, Euråvpåráde      ]
    Euråvpåráde+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Ill: [Europarádijda, Euråvpårádijda]
    Euråvpåráde+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Ess: [Europaráden, Euråvpåráden]
    Euråvpåráde+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Euråvpåráde+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
  
  Propernoun - Adriamerra: # MARJA-plc
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Adriamerra
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Adriamera
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Adriamerav
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: Adriameran
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Adriamerraj
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: Adriameras
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: Adriamerajn
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Adriamera
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Adriamerajda
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Adriamerran
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: adriameralasj
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: adriamerak
  
  Propernoun - Bådåddjo: # MARJA-plc
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Bådåddjo
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Bådådjo
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Bådådjov
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: Bådådjon
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Bådåddjuj
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: Bådådjos
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: [Bådådjujn, Bådådjojn]
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Bådådjo
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Bådådjojda
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Bådåddjon
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: bådådjolasj
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: bådådjok

  Propernoun - Birtsse: # MARJA-sur
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom: Birtsse
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen: Birtsse
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Acc: Birtssev
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ine: Birtssen
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill: Birtssáj
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela: Birtsses
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Com: Birtssijn
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Nom: Birtsse
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Ill: Birtssijda
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Ess: Birtssen
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Propernoun - Suobma: # SUOBMA-plc
    Suobma+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Suobma
    Suobma+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Suoma
    Suobma+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Suomav
    Suobma+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: Suoman
    Suobma+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Suobmaj
    Suobma+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: Suomas
    Suobma+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: Suomajn
    Suobma+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Suoma
    Suobma+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Suomajda
    Suobma+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Suobman
    Suobma+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Suobma+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
  
#  Propernoun - Kuoljok: # LONDON-sur
#    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom: Kuoljok
#    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen: Kuoljoga
#    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Acc: Kuoljogav
#    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ine: Kuoljogin
#    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill: Kuoljogij
#    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela: Kuoljogis
#    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Com: Kuoljogijn
#    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Nom: Kuoljoga
#    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Ill: Kuoljogijda
#    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Ess: Kuoljogin
#    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
#    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Njávisj: # LONDON-ani
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Nom: Njávisj
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Gen: Njávitja
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Acc: Njávitjav
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ine: Njávitjin
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ill: Njávitjij
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ela: Njávitjis
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Com: Njávitjijn
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Pl+Nom: Njávitja
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Pl+Ill: Njávitjijda
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Ess: Njávitjin
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Propernoun - Samovarteáhtar: # LONDON-org
    Samovarteáhtar+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom: Samovarteáhtar
    Samovarteáhtar+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen: Samovarteáhttara
    Samovarteáhtar+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Acc: Samovarteáhttarav
    Samovarteáhtar+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ine: Samovarteáhttarin
    Samovarteáhtar+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill: Samovarteáhttarij
    Samovarteáhtar+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela: Samovarteáhttaris
    Samovarteáhtar+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Com: Samovarteáhttarijn
    Samovarteáhtar+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Nom: Samovarteáhttara
    Samovarteáhtar+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Ill: Samovarteáhttarijda
    Samovarteáhtar+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Ess: Samovarteáhttarin
    Samovarteáhtar+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Samovarteáhtar+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
